Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IV.] SOCIAL AND FINANCIAL ASSESSMENT OF

PROPOSED
MANDATORY HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE

§23-51 Proposed mandatory health insurance
coverage; impact assessment report. Before any legislative measure that
mandates health insurance coverage for specific health services, specific
diseases, or certain providers of health care services as part of individual or
group health insurance policies, can be considered, there shall be concurrent
resolutions passed requesting the auditor to prepare and submit to the
legislature a report that assesses both the social and financial effects of the
proposed mandated coverage. The concurrent resolutions shall designate a
specific legislative bill that:

(1) Has been introduced in the legislature; and

(2) Includes, at a minimum, information identifying
the:

(A) Specific health service, disease, or
provider that would be covered;

(B) Extent of the coverage;

(C) Target groups that would be covered;

(D) Limits on utilization, if any; and

(E) Standards of care.

For purposes of this part, mandated health insurance
coverage shall not include mandated optionals. [L 1987, c 331, pt of §1; am L
1990, c 227, §1; am L 1996, c 270, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next